Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1361.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.0605, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Evidence; identity; date of birth. (a) Only the following is satisfactory evidence of an applicant's identity and date of birth under section 171.06, subdivision 3, paragraph (b): (1) a driver's license or identification card that: (i) complies with all requirements of the REAL ID Act; (ii) is not designated as temporary or limited term; and (iii) is current or has been expired for five years or less; (2) a valid, unexpired United States passport, including a passport booklet or passport card, issued by the United States Department of State; (3) a certified copy of a birth certificate issued by a government bureau of vital statistics or equivalent agency in the applicant's state of birth, which must bear the raised or authorized seal of the issuing government entity; (4) a consular report of birth abroad, certification of report of birth, or certification of birth abroad, issued by the United States Department of State, Form FS-240, Form DS-1350, or Form FS-545; (5) a valid, unexpired permanent resident card issued by the United States Department of Homeland Security or the former Immigration and Naturalization Service of the United States Department of Justice, Form I-551. If the Form I-551 validity period has been automatically extended by the United States Department of Homeland Security, it is deemed unexpired, regardless of the expiration date listed; (6) a foreign passport with an unexpired temporary I-551 stamp or a temporary I-551 printed notation on a machine-readable immigrant visa with a United States Department of Homeland Security admission stamp within the validity period; (7) a United States Department of Homeland Security Form I-94 or Form I-94A with a photograph and an unexpired temporary I-551 stamp; (8) a United States Department of State Form DS-232 with a United States Department of Homeland Security admission stamp and validity period; (9) a certificate of naturalization issued by the United States Department of Homeland Security, Form N-550 or Form N-570; (10) a certificate of citizenship issued by the United States Department of Homeland Security, Form N-560 or Form N-561; (11) an unexpired employment authorization document issued by the United States Department of Homeland Security, Form I-766 or Form I-688B. If the Form I-766 validity period has been automatically extended by the United States Department of Homeland Security, it is deemed unexpired, regardless of the expiration date listed; (12) a valid, unexpired passport issued by a foreign country and a valid, unexpired United States visa accompanied by documentation of the applicant's most recent lawful admittance into the United States;new text begin ornew text end (13) a document as designated by the United States Department of Homeland Security under Code of Federal Regulations, title 6, part 37.11 (c)(1)(x)deleted text begin ;deleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (14) a copy of the applicant's certificate of marriage certified by the issuing government jurisdiction; deleted text end deleted text begin (15) a certified copy of a court order that specifies the applicant's name change; or deleted text end deleted text begin (16) a certified copy of a divorce decree or dissolution of marriage that specifies the applicant's name change, issued by a court. deleted text end (b) A document under paragraph (a) must be legible and unaltered. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.0605, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Evidence of name change. new text end new text begin The following is satisfactory evidence of an applicant's name change: new text end new text begin (1) a copy of the applicant's certificate of marriage certified by the issuing government jurisdiction; new text end new text begin (2) a certified copy of a court order that specifies the applicant's name change; or new text end new text begin (3) a certified copy of a court-issued divorce decree or dissolution of marriage that specifies the applicant's name change. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.17, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Offenses. (a) The department shall immediately revoke the license of a driver upon receiving a record of the driver's conviction of: (1) manslaughter resulting from the operation of a motor vehicle deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin under section 609.20 or 609.205;new text end new text begin (2)new text end criminal vehicular homicide or injury under section 609.2112, 609.2113, or 609.2114, or Minnesota Statutes 2012, section 609.21; deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end a violation of section 169A.20 or 609.487; deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end a felony in the commission of which a motor vehicle was used; deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end failure to stop and disclose identity and render aid, as required under section 169.09, in the event of a motor vehicle accident, resulting in the death or personal injury of another; deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end perjury or the making of a false affidavit or statement to the department under any law relating to the application, ownership, or operation of a motor vehicle, including on the certification required under section 171.05, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (1), item (ii), subitem (C), to issue an instruction permit to a homeschool student; deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (7)new text end except as this section otherwise provides, three charges of violating within a period of 12 months any of the provisions of chapter 169 or of the rules or municipal ordinances enacted in conformance with chapter 169, for which the accused may be punished upon conviction by imprisonment; deleted text begin (7)deleted text end new text begin (8)new text end two or more violations, within five years, of the misdemeanor offense described in section 169.444, subdivision 2, paragraph (a); deleted text begin (8)deleted text end new text begin (9)new text end the gross misdemeanor offense described in section 169.444, subdivision 2, paragraph (b); deleted text begin (9)deleted text end new text begin (10)new text end an offense in another state that, if committed in this state, would be grounds for revoking the driver's license; or deleted text begin (10)deleted text end new text begin (11)new text end a violation of an applicable speed limit by a person driving in excess of 100 miles per hour. The person's license must be revoked for six months for a violation of this clause, or for a longer minimum period of time applicable under section 169A.53, 169A.54, or 171.174. (b) The department shall immediately revoke the school bus endorsement of a driver upon receiving a record of the driver's conviction of the misdemeanor offense described in section 169.443, subdivision 7.